Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,119
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and issue orders as necessary to carry out the Title Insurance Agent Act.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 42.